Illinois, session 104th, HB355.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Methamphetamine Precursor Control Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 648/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Methamphetamine Precursor Control Act.9(Source: P.A. 94-694, eff. 1-15-06.)